Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 16. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 275. ELECTION FOR OFFICERS OF CITY WITH 200,000 POPULATION

Sec. 275.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to a city with a population of 200,000 or more.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 275.002. MAJORITY VOTE REQUIRED. To be elected to a city office, a candidate must receive a majority of the total number of votes received by all candidates for the office.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 275.003. ELECTION BY PLACE REQUIRED. (a) When a city attains a population of 200,000 or more, the city shall establish a system of electing its governing body in accordance with this section if in the city's general elections more than one member of its governing body is elected from the same set of candidates.

(b) Not later than the 60th day before the date of the first general election held in accordance with this section, the city's governing body shall assign a place number to each position on the governing body that is to be elected from the same territory as another position, identifying it by the name of the incumbent at the time the assignment is made.

(c) One person shall be elected to fill each position for which a place number appears on the ballot.

(d) The city shall use the place system required by this section until the city establishes another system of election that is consistent with an election by majority vote.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.